dictsource/ne_rules
// Nepali Language.
// This ne_rules file is prepared by Him Prasad Gautam < himjee@yahoo.com >.
// This file is UTF-8 encoded.

// letter groups:
// A - Independent and Dependent Vowels:
//	0x904 to 0x914, 0x93E to 0x94D, 0x950, 0x960 to 0x963, 0x972
// B - Dependent Vowels and Halanta:
//	0x93E to 0x94C, 0x94d, 0x962, 0x963
// C - Consonants:
//	0x915 to 0x939, 0x958 to 0x95F, 0x97B, 0x97c, 0x97E, 0x97F
//    Independent Vowels:
//	0x904 to 0x914, 0x950,0x960, 0x961, 0x977
//  Nepali Alphabets:	0x901 to 0x980
//  Numbers:	0x966 to 096F
//  symbols:
//	0x901 to 0x903, 0x93C, 0x93D, 0x951 to 0x954, 0x964, 0x965, 0x970, 0x971, 0x97D

// conditional rules
// ?1   Pronounciation of a consonant at the end of a word.
// ?2	use diphthong for "ai".
// ?3	use diphthong for "au"




// Vowels, vowel signs and candrabindu; not the halant, which group A includes.
// Consonant letters only (group C also matches the anusvara: इंडिया).
.L02 क ख ग घ ङ च छ ज झ ञ ट ठ ड ढ ण त थ द ध न ऩ प फ ब भ म य र ऱ ल ळ ऴ व श ष स ह
.L01 अ आ इ ई उ ऊ ऋ ए ऐ ओ औ ा ि ी ु ू ृ े ै ो ौ ँ

// Schwa kept or dropped: corrections learned from WikiPron on top of the
// phoneme table's own schwa deletion.
// The rule lines marked "// generated" in each consonant group are not
// hand-written: android/tools/schwa learns them (rule induction on 80% of
// the words) and writes them here.
// L20 = written vowels (signs, and independent vowels except अ);
// L21 = consonant letters; L22 = any Devanagari letter; L23 = ं ँ.
.L20 ा ि ी ु ू ृ ॄ ॅ ॆ े ै ॉ ॊ ो ौ आ इ ई उ ऊ ऋ ऌ ऍ ऎ ए ऐ ऑ ऒ ओ औ ॠ ॡ ॢ ॣ
.L21 क ख ग घ ङ च छ ज झ ञ ट ठ ड ढ ण त थ द ध न ऩ प फ ब भ म य र ऱ ल ळ ऴ व श ष स ह क़ ख़ ग़ ज़ ड़ ढ़ फ़ य़
.L22 ऄ अ आ इ ई उ ऊ ऋ ऌ ऍ ऎ ए ऐ ऑ ऒ ओ औ क ख ग घ ङ च छ ज झ ञ ट ठ ड ढ ण त थ द ध न ऩ प फ ब भ म य र ऱ ल ळ ऴ व श ष स ह ़ ऽ ा ि ी ु ू ृ ॄ ॅ ॆ े ै ॉ ॊ ो ौ ् क़ ख़ ग़ ज़ ड़ ढ़ फ़ य़ ॠ ॡ ॢ ॣ ं ँ ः
.L23 ं ँ

.replace
	०	0
	१	1
 	२	2
 	३	3
 	४	4
 	५	5
 	६	6
 	७	7
 	८	8
 	९	9

// Alphabetic Vowels and Consonants followed by special symbols.

	अ़	अ
	अ॑	अ
	अ॒	अ
	अ॓	अ
	अ॔	अ
	ऄ़	ऄ
	ऄ॑	ऄ
	ऄ॒	ऄ
	ऄ॓	ऄ
	ऄ॔	ऄ
	आ़	आ
	आ॑	आ
	आ॒	आ
	आ॓	आ
	आ॔	आ
	इ़	इ
	इ॑	इ
	इ॒	इ
	इ॓	इ
	इ॔	इ
	ई़	ई
	ई॑	ई
	ई॒	ई
	ई॓	ई
	ई॔	ई
	उ़	उ
	उ॑	उ
	उ॒	उ
	उ॓	उ
	उ॔	उ
	ऊ़	ऊ
	ऊ॑	ऊ
	ऊ॒	ऊ
	ऊ॓	ऊ
	ऊ॔	ऊ
	ऋ़	ऋ
	ऋ॑	ऋ
	ऋ॒	ऋ
	ऋ॓	ऋ
	ऋ॔	ऋ
	ॠ़	ॠ
	ॠ॑	ॠ
	ॠ॒	ॠ
	ॠ॓	ॠ
	ॠ॔	ॠ
	ऌ़	ऌ
	ऌ॑	ऌ
	ऌ॒	ऌ
	ऌ॓	ऌ
	ऌ॔	ऌ
	ॡ़	ॡ
	ॡ॑	ॡ
	ॡ॒	ॡ
	ॡ॓	ॡ
	ॡ॔	ॡ
	ऍ़	ऍ
	ऍ॑	ऍ
	ऍ॒	ऍ
	ऍ॓	ऍ
	ऍ॔	ऍ
	ऎ़	ऎ
	ऎ॑	ऎ
	ऎ॒	ऎ
	ऎ॓	ऎ
	ऎ॔	ऎ
	ए़	ए
	ए॑	ए
	ए॒	ए
	ए॓	ए
	ए॔	ए
	ऐ़	ऐ
	ऐ॑	ऐ
	ऐ॒	ऐ
	ऐ॓	ऐ
	ऐ॔	ऐ
	ऑ़	ऑ
	ऑ॑	ऑ
	ऑ॒	ऑ
	ऑ॓	ऑ
	ऑ॔	ऑ
	ऒ़	ऒ
	ऒ॑	ऒ
	ऒ॒	ऒ
	ऒ॓	ऒ
	ऒ॔	ऒ
	ओ़	ओ
	ओ॑	ओ
	ओ॒	ओ
	ओ॓	ओ
	ओ॔	ओ
	औ॓	औ
	औ॔	औ
	औ़	औ
	औ॑	औ
	औ॒	औ
	औ॓	औ
	औ॔	औ
	क॑	क
	क॒	क
	क॓	क
	क॔	क
	क़	क़
	क़	क़
	क़़	क़
	क़॑	क़
	क़॒	क़
	क़॓	क़
	क़॔	क़
	ख॑	ख
	ख॒	ख
	ख॓	ख
	ख॔	ख
	ख़	ख़
	ख़	ख़
	ख़़	ख़
	ख़॑	ख़
	ख़॒	ख़
	ख़॓	ख़
	ख़॔	ख़
	ग॑	ग
	ग॒	ग
	ग॓	ग
	ग॔	ग
	ग़	ग़
	ग़	ग़
	ग़़	ग़
	ग़॑	ग़
	ग़॒	ग़
	ग़॓	ग़
	ग़॔	ग़
	घ़	घ
	घ॑	घ
	घ॒	घ
	घ॓	घ
	घ॔	घ
	ग॒	ॻ
	ॻ़	ॻ
	ॻ॑	ॻ
	ॻ॒	ॻ
	ॻ॓	ॻ
	ॻ॔	ॻ
	ङ़	ङ
	ङ॑	ङ
	ङ॒	ङ
	ङ॓	ङ
	ङ॔	ङ
	च़	च
	च॑	च
	च॒	च
	च॓	च
	च॔	च
	छ़	छ
	छ॑	छ
	छ॒	छ
	छ॓	छ
	छ॔	छ
	ज॑	ज
	ज॒	ज
	ज॓	ज
	ज॔	ज
	ज़	ज़
	ज़़	ज़
	ज़॑	ज़
	ज़॒	ज़
	ज़॓	ज़
	ज़॔	ज़
	ज॒	ॼ
	ॼ़	ॼ
	ॼ॑	ॼ
	ॼ॒	ॼ
	ॼ॓	ॼ
	ॼ॔	ॼ
	झ़	झ
	झ॑	झ
	झ॒	झ
	झ॓	झ
	झ॔	झ
	ञ़	ञ
	ञ॑	ञ
	ञ॒	ञ
	ञ॓	ञ
	ञ॔	ञ
	ट़	ट
	ट॑	ट
	ट॒	ट
	ट॓	ट
	ट॔	ट
	ठ़	ठ
	ठ॑	ठ
	ठ॒	ठ
	ठ॓	ठ
	ठ॔	ठ
	ड॑	ड
	ड॒	ड
	ड॓	ड
	ड॔	ड
	ड़	ड़
	ड़़	ड़
	ड़॑	ड़
	ड़॒	ड़
	ड़॓	ड़
	ड़॔	ड़
	ढ॑	ढ
	ढ॒	ढ
	ढ॓	ढ
	ढ॔	ढ
	ढ़	ढ़
	ढ़़	ढ़
	ढ़॑	ढ़
	ढ़॒	ढ़
	ढ़॓	ढ़
	ढ़॔	ढ़
	ण़	ण
	ण॑	ण
	ण॒	ण
	ण॓	ण
	ण॔	ण
	त़	त
	त॑	त
	त॒	त
	त॓	त
	त॔	त
	थ़	थ
	थ॑	थ
	थ॒	थ
	थ॓	थ
	थ॔	थ
	द़	द
	द॑	द
	द॒	द
	द॓	द
	द॔	द
	ध़	ध
	ध॑	ध
	ध॒	ध
	ध॓	ध
	ध॔	ध
	ड॒	ॾ
	ॾ़	ॾ
	ॾ॑	ॾ
	ॾ॒	ॾ
	ॾ॓	ॾ
	ॾ॔	ॾ
	न॑	न
	न॒	न
	न॓	न
	न॔	न
	ऩ	ऩ
	ऩ़	ऩ
	ऩ॑	ऩ
	ऩ॒	ऩ
	ऩ॓	ऩ
	ऩ॔	ऩ
	प़	प
	प॑	प
	प॒	प
	प॓	प
	प॔	प
	फ॑	फ
	फ॒	फ
	फ॓	फ
	फ॔	फ
	फ़	फ़
	फ़़	फ़
	फ़॑	फ़
	फ़॒	फ़
	फ़॓	फ़
	फ़॔	फ़
	ब़	ब
	ब॑	ब
	ब॒	ब
	ब॓	ब
	ब॔	ब
	भ़	भ
	भ॑	भ
	भ॒	भ
	भ॓	भ
	भ॔	भ
	ब॒	ॿ
	ॿ़	ॿ
	ॿ॑	ॿ
	ॿ॒	ॿ
	ॿ॓	ॿ
	ॿ॔	ॿ
	म़	म
	म॑	म
	म॒	म
	म॓	म
	म॔	म
	य॑	य
	य॒	य
	य॓	य
	य॔	य
	य़	य़
	य़़	य़
	य़॑	य़
	य़॒	य़
	य़॓	य़
	य़॔	य़
	र॑	र
	र॒	र
	र॓	र
	र॔	र
	ऱ	ऱ
	ऱ़	ऱ
	ऱ॑	ऱ
	ऱ॒	ऱ
	ऱ॓	ऱ
	ऱ॔	ऱ
	ल़	ल
	ल॑	ल
	ल॒	ल
	ल॓	ल
	ल॔	ल
	ळ॑	ळ
	ळ॒	ळ
	ळ॓	ळ
	ळ॔	ळ
	ऴ	ऴ
	ऴ़	ऴ
	ऴ॑	ऴ
	ऴ॒	ऴ
	ऴ॓	ऴ
	ऴ॔	ऴ
	व़	व
	व॑	व
	व॒	व
	व॓	व
	व॔	व
	श़	श
	श॑	श
	श॒	श
	श॓	श
	श॔	श
	ष़	ष
	ष॑	ष
	ष॒	ष
	ष॓	ष
	ष॔	ष
	स़	स
	स॑	स
	स॒	स
	स॓	स
	स॔	स
	ह़	ह
	ह॑	ह
	ह॒	ह
	ह॓	ह
	ह॔	ह
		
		

	// Independent (Alphabetic) Vowels

.group ऄ
	ऄ	e~'

.group अ
	अ	V
	अँ	V~'

.group आ
	आ	a:
	आँ	a~''

.group इ

	इ	I
	इँ	i~'

.group ई
	ई	I:
	ई (_	,i:	// final -i is always long; secondary stress (not primary)
			// needed so ph_hindi_base's i: phoneme doesn't self-demote
			// back to plain i when this syllable isn't the word's own
			// stressed one - see hi_rules for the same fix
	ईँ	i~''

.group उ
	उ	U
	उँ	u~'


.group ऊ
	ऊ	U
	ऊँ	u~'

.group ऋ
	ऋ	rI

.group ॠ
	ॠ	rrI:

.group ऌ
	ऌ	lrI

.group ॡ
	ॡ	llri:

.group ऍ
	ऍ	E

.group ऎ
	ऎ	e
	ऎँ	e~'

.group ए
	ए	e:
	एँ	e~',

.group ऐ
	ऐ	VI
	ऐँ	E~'
?2	ऐ	aI	// ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]

.group ऑ
	ऑ	O

.group ऒ
	ऒ	o

.group ओ
	ओ	o:
	ओँ	o~'

.group औ
	औ	VU	// ?? [aU] [O:]
	औँ	O~'
?3	औ	aU	// ?? [aU] [O:]

.group ॐ
	ॐ	o~''m

.group ॲ
	ॲ	V~'


	// Dependent (Symbolic) Vowel

.group ा
	ा	a:,k'a::r@ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	C) ा	a:
	C) ाँ	a~'

.group ि
	ि	i'k'a::r@ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	C) ि	I
	C) िँ	i~'

.group ी
	ी	i:,=k'a::r@ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	C) ी (_	,i:	// see .group ई above for why the stress mark matters
	C) ी	I:
	C) ीँ	i~'

.group ु
	ु	U'k'a::r@ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	अन) ु	u,-
	C) ु	u
	C) ुँ	u~'

.group ू
	ू	wu:,=k'a::r@ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	C) ू	u:
	C) ूँ	u~'

.group ृ
	ृ	ri:,k'a:r@ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	C) ृ	r'I

.group ॄ
	ॄ	rri:,k'a:r@ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	C) ॄ	rr'i:,

.group ॅ
	ॅ	E,ci:n'h@:
	C) ॅ	V~'

.group ॆ
	ॆ	e'k'a::r@/ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	C) ॆ	e

.group े
	े	e:'k'a::r@ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	C) े	e:
	C) ेँ	e~'

.group ै
	ै	VI:'k'a::r@ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	C) ै	E:	// ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]
	C) ैँ	E~'
?2	C) ै	aI	// ?? [aI] [E:] [&:]

.group ॉ
	ॉ	O:
	C) ॉ	a:n

.group ॊ
	ॊ	ok'a::r@
	C) ॊ	o

.group ो
	ो	o:,k'a::r@ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	C) ो	o:
	C) ोँ	o~'

.group ौ
	ौ	O:uka::r@ // If not followed to a Consonant.
	C) ौ	O:	//	[O:] or [aU] ??
	C) ौँ	O~'
?3	C) ौ	aU	//	[O:] or [aU] ??

.group ॢ
	ॢ	l'ri:k'a::r@

.group ॣ
	ॣ	ll'ri:,k'a::r@:


	// the Consonants(वयञ्जन)

.group क
	क	kV
        _L22) क (हL22_           k        // generated
        _L22) क (हL22            k        // generated
        _L22L22) क (हL22_        k        // generated
        _L22L22) क (हL22         k        // generated
        L22) क (हL22_            k        // generated
        L22) क (हL22             k        // generated
        _L22) क (L21ाL21         k        // generated
        _L22) क (मा_             k        // generated
        _L22) क (मा              k        // generated
        _L22L22) क (मा_          k        // generated
        _L22L22) क (मा           k        // generated
	कँ	kV~'
	कॅ	kV~'
	क (B	k
?1	क (_k 
	्) क (_	k@/
	क (्क	k,
	क (्य	k:


.group ख
	ख	k#V
        _L22) ख (हL22_           k#       // generated
        _L22) ख (हL22            k#       // generated
        _L22L22) ख (हL22_        k#       // generated
        _L22L22) ख (हL22         k#       // generated
        L22) ख (हL22_            k#       // generated
        L22) ख (हL22             k#       // generated
        _L22) ख (L21ाL21         k#       // generated
        _L22) ख (मा_             k#       // generated
        _L22) ख (मा              k#       // generated
        _L22L22) ख (मा_          k#       // generated
        _L22L22) ख (मा           k#       // generated
	ख (B	k#
?1	ख (_	k#
	्) ख (_	k#@/
	ख (्ख	k#,
	खँ	k#V~'
	खॅ	k#V~'

.group ग
	ग	gV
        _L22) ग (हL22_           g        // generated
        _L22) ग (हL22            g        // generated
        _L22L22) ग (हL22_        g        // generated
        _L22L22) ग (हL22         g        // generated
        L22) ग (हL22_            g        // generated
        L22) ग (हL22             g        // generated
        _L22) ग (L21ाL21         g        // generated
        _L22) ग (मा_             g        // generated
        _L22) ग (मा              g        // generated
        _L22L22) ग (मा_          g        // generated
        _L22L22) ग (मा           g        // generated
	ग (B	g
?1	ग (_	g
	ग (्ग	g,
	्) ग (_	g@/
	गँ	gV~'
	गॅ	gV~'

.group घ
	घ	g#V
        _L22) घ (हL22_           g#       // generated
        _L22) घ (हL22            g#       // generated
        _L22L22) घ (हL22_        g#       // generated
        _L22L22) घ (हL22         g#       // generated
        L22) घ (हL22_            g#       // generated
        L22) घ (हL22             g#       // generated
        _L22) घ (L21ाL21         g#       // generated
        _L22) घ (मा_             g#       // generated
        _L22) घ (मा              g#       // generated
        _L22L22) घ (मा_          g#       // generated
        _L22L22) घ (मा           g#       // generated
	घ (B	g#
?1	घ (_	g#
	घ (्घ	g#,
	्) घ (_	g#@/
	घँ	g#V~'
	घॅ	g#V~'


.group ङ	// Phoneme adjustment suggested
	ङ	NV
	ङ (B	N
	्) ङ (_	N@/
	ङ (_	N

.group च
	च	cV
        _L22) च (हL22_           c        // generated
        _L22) च (हL22            c        // generated
        _L22L22) च (हL22_        c        // generated
        _L22L22) च (हL22         c        // generated
        L22) च (हL22_            c        // generated
        L22) च (हL22             c        // generated
        _L22) च (L21ाL21         c        // generated
        _L22) च (मा_             c        // generated
        _L22) च (मा              c        // generated
        _L22L22) च (मा_          c        // generated
        _L22L22) च (मा           c        // generated
	च (B	c
?1	च (_	c
	च (्च	c,
	च (्य	c:
	्) च (_	c@/
	चँ	cV~'
	चॅ	cV~'

.group छ
	छ	c#V
        _L22) छ (हL22_           c#       // generated
        _L22) छ (हL22            c#       // generated
        _L22L22) छ (हL22_        c#       // generated
        _L22L22) छ (हL22         c#       // generated
        L22) छ (हL22_            c#       // generated
        L22) छ (हL22             c#       // generated
        _L22) छ (L21ाL21         c#       // generated
        _L22) छ (मा_             c#       // generated
        _L22) छ (मा              c#       // generated
        _L22L22) छ (मा_          c#       // generated
        _L22L22) छ (मा           c#       // generated
	छ (B	c#
	्) छ (C	c#@
	छ (_	c#@
	छँ	c#V~'
	छॅ	c#V~'

.group ज
	ज	JV
        _L22) ज (हL22_           J        // generated
        _L22) ज (हL22            J        // generated
        _L22L22) ज (हL22_        J        // generated
        _L22L22) ज (हL22         J        // generated
        L22) ज (हL22_            J        // generated
        L22) ज (हL22             J        // generated
        _L22) ज (L21ाL21         J        // generated
        _L22) ज (मा_             J        // generated
        _L22) ज (मा              J        // generated
        _L22L22) ज (मा_          J        // generated
        _L22L22) ज (मा           J        // generated
	ज (B	J
?1	ज (_	J 
	ज (्ज	J,
	जँ	JV~'
	जॅ	JV~'
	्) ज (_	J@/

.group झ	// Phoneme adjustment suggested.
	झ	J#V
	झ (B	J#
	झँ	J#V~'
	झॅ 	J#V~'
	झ (्झ	J,
	झ (_	J#

.group ञ	// Phoneme adjustment suggested
	ञ	n^V
	ञ (B	n^
	्) ञ (_	n^@/
	ज्) ञ (_	n^@:,
	ञ (_	n^@

.group ट
	ट	t.V
        _L22) ट (हL22_           t.       // generated
        _L22) ट (हL22            t.       // generated
        _L22L22) ट (हL22_        t.       // generated
        _L22L22) ट (हL22         t.       // generated
        L22) ट (हL22_            t.       // generated
        L22) ट (हL22             t.       // generated
        _L22) ट (L21ाL21         t.       // generated
        _L22) ट (मा_             t.       // generated
        _L22) ट (मा              t.       // generated
        _L22L22) ट (मा_          t.       // generated
        _L22L22) ट (मा           t.       // generated
	ट (B	t.
	टँ	t.V~'
	टॅ	t.V~'
	ट (्ट	t.,
?1	ट (_	t. 
	्) ट (_	t.@/
	ट (्ठ	t.,
	ट (्य	t.:
